Hawaii statutes.
§560:7-302 Trustee's standard of care and
performance; standards for trustee actions under an advisor's authority.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by the terms of the trust, the trustee shall
observe the standards in dealing with the trust assets that would be observed
by a prudent person dealing with the property of another, and if the trustee
has special skills or is named trustee on the basis of representations of
special skills or expertise, the trustee is under a duty to use those skills.

(b) Whenever the terms of a trust direct that
an advisor, rather than the trustee, shall have authority for certain fiduciary
actions, the standard of care and performance for actions that are within the
scope of the advisor's authority under the terms of a trust shall be as
follows:

(1) Where one or more persons are given authority by
the terms of a trust, and accept this authority, to direct, consent to, or
disapprove a trustee's actual or proposed investment decisions, distribution
decisions, or any other decision of the trustee, those persons shall be
considered to be advisors and shall have the duties and obligations of
fiduciaries when exercising the given authority, unless the trust provides
otherwise;

(2) If a trust provides that a trustee is to follow the
direction of an advisor, and the trustee acts in accordance with the advisor's
direction, then except in cases of wilful misconduct or gross negligence on the
part of the trustee so directed, the trustee shall not be liable for any loss
resulting directly or indirectly from any such act;

(3) If a trust provides that a trustee is to make
decisions with the consent of an advisor, then except in cases of wilful
misconduct or gross negligence on the part of the trustee, the trustee shall
not be liable for any loss resulting directly or indirectly from any act taken
or omitted as a result of the advisor's failure to provide consent after having
been requested to do so by the trustee; and

(4) Whenever a trust provides that a trustee is to
follow the direction of an advisor with respect to investment decisions,
distribution decisions, or any other decision of the trustee, then except to
the extent that the terms of the trust provide otherwise, the trustee shall
have no duty to:

(A) Monitor the conduct of the advisor;

(B) Provide advice to the advisor or consult
with the advisor; or

(C) Communicate with or warn or apprise any
beneficiary or third party concerning instances in which the trustee would or
might have exercised the trustee's own discretion in a manner different from
the manner directed by the advisor.

Absent clear and convincing evidence to the
contrary, the actions of the trustee pertaining to matters within the scope of
the advisor's authority, such as confirming that the advisor's directions have
been carried out and recording and reporting actions taken at the advisor's
direction, shall be presumed to be administrative actions taken by the trustee
solely to allow the trustee to perform the duties assigned to the trustee under
the trust, and the administrative actions shall not be deemed to constitute an
undertaking by the trustee to monitor the advisor or otherwise participate in
actions within the scope of the advisor's authority.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Advisor" includes a protector that
has been granted powers and authority by the terms of a trust, including:

(1) The power to remove and appoint trustees,
advisors, trust committee members, and other protectors;

(2) The power to modify or amend the trust to achieve
favorable tax status or to facilitate the efficient administration of the
trust; and

(3) The power to modify, expand, or restrict the
terms of a power of appointment granted to a beneficiary by the trust.

"Investment decision" means the
retention, purchase, sale, exchange, tender, or other transaction affecting the
ownership of or rights in any investment, or the valuation of nonpublicly
traded investments. [L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 2014, c
59, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Standard of care governing investment policy of board of
regents of University of Hawaii. Att. Gen. Op. 85-26.

Standard of care governing investment policy of trustees of
retirement system. Att. Gen. Op. 87-2.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next